Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2603
Service of process; subpoenas.

(1) By acting as an athlete
agent in this state, a nonresident individual appoints the Secretary of State
as the individual's agent for service of process in any civil action in this
state related to the individual's acting as an athlete agent in this state.

(2) The Secretary of
State may issue subpoenas for any material that is relevant to the administration
of the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 3.